Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE A. COURTS

CHAPTER 22. APPELLATE COURTS

SUBCHAPTER A. SUPREME COURT

Sec. 22.001. JURISDICTION.

(a) The supreme court has appellate jurisdiction, except in criminal law matters, of an appealable order or judgment of the trial courts if the court determines that the appeal presents a question of law that is important to the jurisprudence of the state. The supreme court's jurisdiction does not include cases in which the jurisdiction of the court of appeals is made final by statute.

(b) A case over which the court has jurisdiction under Subsection (a) may be carried to the supreme court by petition for review.

(c) Except as provided by this subsection or other law, an appeal may be taken to the supreme court only if the appeal was first brought to the court of appeals. An appeal may be taken directly to the supreme court from an order of a trial court granting or denying an interlocutory or permanent injunction on the ground of the constitutionality of a statute of this state.

(d) The supreme court has the power, on affidavit or otherwise, as the court may determine, to ascertain the matters of fact that are necessary to the proper exercise of its jurisdiction.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1106, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 204, Sec. 1.04, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 22.002. WRIT POWER. (a) The supreme court or a justice of the supreme court may issue writs of procedendo and certiorari and all writs of quo warranto and mandamus agreeable to the principles of law regulating those writs, against a statutory county court judge, a statutory probate court judge, a district judge, a court of appeals or a justice of a court of appeals, or any officer of state government except the governor, the court of criminal appeals, or a judge of the court of criminal appeals.

(b) The supreme court or, in vacation, a justice of the supreme court may issue a writ of mandamus to compel a statutory county court judge, a statutory probate court judge, or a district judge to proceed to trial and judgment in a case.

(c) Only the supreme court has the authority to issue a writ of mandamus or injunction, or any other mandatory or compulsory writ or process, against any of the officers of the executive departments of the government of this state to order or compel the performance of a judicial, ministerial, or discretionary act or duty that, by state law, the officer or officers are authorized to perform.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

(e) The supreme court or a justice of the supreme court, either in termtime or vacation, may issue a writ of habeas corpus when a person is restrained in his liberty by virtue of an order, process, or commitment issued by a court or judge on account of the violation of an order, judgment, or decree previously made, rendered, or entered by the court or judge in a civil case. Pending the hearing of an application for a writ of habeas corpus, the supreme court or a justice of the supreme court may admit to bail a person to whom the writ of habeas corpus may be so granted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 355, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 2.01, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 22.003. PROCEDURE OF THE COURT. (a) The supreme court from time to time shall promulgate suitable rules, forms, and regulations for carrying into effect the provisions of this chapter relating to the jurisdiction and practice of the supreme court.

(b) The supreme court may make and enforce all necessary rules of practice and procedure, not inconsistent with the law, for the government of the supreme court and all other courts of the state to expedite the dispatch of business in those courts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.0035. MODIFICATION OR SUSPENSION OF CERTAIN PROVISIONS RELATING TO COURT PROCEEDINGS AFFECTED BY DISASTER. (a) In this section, "disaster" has the meaning assigned by Section 418.004.

(b) Notwithstanding any other statute, the supreme court may modify or suspend procedures for the conduct of any court proceeding affected by a disaster during the pendency of a disaster declared by the governor. An order under this section may not extend for more than 90 days from the date the order was signed unless renewed by the chief justice of the supreme court.

(c) If a disaster prevents the supreme court from acting under Subsection (b), the chief justice of the supreme court may act on behalf of the supreme court under that subsection.

(d) If a disaster prevents the chief justice from acting under Subsection (c), the court of criminal appeals may act on behalf of the supreme court under Subsection (b).

(e) If a disaster prevents the court of criminal appeals from acting under Subsection (d), the presiding judge of the court of criminal appeals may act on behalf of the supreme court under Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1280 (H.B. 1831), Sec. 5.01, eff. June 19, 2009.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1281 (H.B. 1861), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 1, eff. June 7, 2019.

Sec. 22.004. RULES OF CIVIL PROCEDURE. (a) The supreme court has the full rulemaking power in the practice and procedure in civil actions, except that its rules may not abridge, enlarge, or modify the substantive rights of a litigant.

(b) The supreme court from time to time may promulgate a specific rule or rules of civil procedure, or an amendment or amendments to a specific rule or rules, to be effective at the time the supreme court deems expedient in the interest of a proper administration of justice. The rules and amendments to rules remain in effect unless and until disapproved by the legislature. The clerk of the supreme court shall file with the secretary of state the rules or amendments to rules promulgated by the supreme court under this subsection and shall mail a copy of those rules or amendments to rules to each registered member of the State Bar of Texas not later than the 60th day before the date on which they become effective. On receiving a written request from a member of the legislature, the secretary of state shall provide the member with electronic notifications when the supreme court has promulgated rules or amendments to rules under this section.

(c) So that the supreme court has full rulemaking power in civil actions, a rule adopted by the supreme court repeals all conflicting laws and parts of laws governing practice and procedure in civil actions, but substantive law is not repealed. At the time the supreme court files a rule, the court shall file with the secretary of state a list of each article or section of general law or each part of an article or section of general law that is repealed or modified in any way. The list has the same weight and effect as a decision of the court.

(d) The rules of practice and procedure in civil actions shall be published in the official reports of the supreme court. The supreme court may adopt the method it deems expedient for the printing and distribution of the rules.

(e) This section does not affect the repeal of statutes repealed by Chapter 25, page 201, General Laws, Acts of the 46th Legislature, Regular Session, 1939, on September 1, 1941.

(f) The supreme court shall adopt rules governing the electronic filing of documents in civil cases in justice of the peace courts.

(g) The supreme court shall adopt rules to provide for the dismissal of causes of action that have no basis in law or fact on motion and without evidence. The rules shall provide that the motion to dismiss shall be granted or denied within 45 days of the filing of the motion to dismiss. The rules shall not apply to actions under the Family Code.

(h) The supreme court shall adopt rules to promote the prompt, efficient, and cost-effective resolution of civil actions. The rules shall apply to civil actions in district courts, county courts at law, and statutory probate courts in which the amount in controversy, inclusive of all claims for damages of any kind, whether actual or exemplary, a penalty, attorney's fees, expenses, costs, interest, or any other type of damage of any kind, does not exceed $100,000. The rules shall address the need for lowering discovery costs in these actions and the procedure for ensuring that these actions will be expedited in the civil justice system. The supreme court may not adopt rules under this subsection that conflict with other statutory law.

(h-1) In addition to the rules adopted under Subsection (h), the supreme court shall adopt rules to promote the prompt, efficient, and cost-effective resolution of civil actions filed in county courts at law in which the amount in controversy does not exceed $250,000. The rules shall balance the need for lowering discovery costs in these actions against the complexity of and discovery needs in these actions. The supreme court may not adopt rules under this subsection that conflict with other statutory law.

(i) The supreme court shall adopt rules to provide that the right of an appellant under Section 6.001(b)(1), (2), or (3), Civil Practice and Remedies Code, to supersede a judgment or order on appeal is not subject to being counter-superseded under Rule 24.2(a)(3), Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure, or any other rule. Counter-supersedeas shall remain available to parties in a lawsuit concerning a matter that was the basis of a contested case in an administrative enforcement action.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 297, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 644, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 63 (S.B. 237), Sec. 1, eff. May 11, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 203 (H.B. 274), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 203 (H.B. 274), Sec. 2.01, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (S.B. 791), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 868 (H.B. 2776), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 696 (S.B. 2342), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2020.

Sec. 22.0041. RULES REGARDING FOREIGN LAW AND FOREIGN JUDGMENTS IN CERTAIN FAMILY LAW ACTIONS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Comity" means the recognition by a court of one jurisdiction of the laws and judicial decisions of a court of another jurisdiction.

(2) "Foreign judgment" means a judgment of a court, tribunal, or administrative adjudicator of a jurisdiction outside of the states and territories of the United States.

(3) "Foreign law" means a law, rule, or code of a jurisdiction outside of the states and territories of the United States.

(b) The supreme court shall adopt rules of evidence and procedure to implement the limitations on the granting of comity to a foreign judgment or an arbitration award involving a marriage relationship or a parent-child relationship under the Family Code to protect against violations of constitutional rights and public policy.

(c) The rules adopted under Subsection (b) must:

(1) require that any party who intends to seek enforcement of a judgment or an arbitration award based on foreign law that involves a marriage relationship or a parent-child relationship shall provide timely notice to the court and to each other party, including by providing information required by Rule 203, Texas Rules of Evidence, and by describing the court's authority to enforce or decide to enforce the judgment or award;

(2) require that any party who intends to oppose the enforcement of a judgment or an arbitration award based on foreign law that involves a marriage relationship or a parent-child relationship shall provide timely notice to the court and to each other party and include with the notice an explanation of the party's basis for opposition, including by stating whether the party asserts that the judgment or award violates constitutional rights or public policy;

(3) require a hearing on the record, after notice to the parties, to determine whether the proposed enforcement of a judgment or an arbitration award based on foreign law that involves a marriage relationship or a parent-child relationship violates constitutional rights or public policy;

(4) to facilitate appellate review, require that a court state its findings of fact and conclusions of law in a written order determining whether to enforce a foreign judgment or an arbitration award based on foreign law that involves a marriage relationship or a parent-child relationship;

(5) require that a court's determination under Subdivision (3) or (4) be made promptly so that the action may proceed expeditiously; and

(6) provide that a court may issue any orders the court considers necessary to preserve principles of comity or the freedom to contract for arbitration while protecting against violations of constitutional rights and public policy in the application of foreign law and the recognition and enforcement of foreign judgments and arbitration awards.

(d) In addition to the rules required under Subsection (b), the supreme court shall adopt any other rules the supreme court considers necessary or advisable to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(e) A rule adopted under this section does not apply to an action brought under the International Child Abduction Remedies Act (22 U.S.C. Section 9001 et seq.).

(f) In the event of a conflict between a rule adopted under this section and a federal or state law, the federal or state law prevails.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 771 (H.B. 45), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 22.0042. RULES REGARDING EXEMPTIONS FROM SEIZURE OF PROPERTY; FORM. (a) The supreme court shall adopt rules that:

(1) establish a simple and expedited procedure for a judgment debtor to assert an exemption to the seizure of personal property by a judgment creditor or a receiver appointed under Section 31.002, Civil Practice and Remedies Code;

(2) require a court to stay a proceeding, for a reasonable period, to allow for the assertion of an exemption under Subdivision (1); and

(3) require a court to promptly set a hearing and stay proceedings until a hearing is held, if a judgment debtor timely asserts an exemption under Subdivision (1).

(b) Rules adopted under this section shall require the provision of a notice in plain language to a judgment debtor regarding the right of the judgment debtor to assert one or more exemptions under Subsection (a)(1). The notice must:

(1) be in English with an integrated Spanish translation that can be readily understood by the public and the court;

(2) include the form promulgated under Subsection (c);

(3) list all exemptions under state and federal law to the seizure of personal property; and

(4) provide information for accessing free or low-cost legal assistance.

(c) Rules adopted under this section shall include the promulgation of a form in plain language for asserting an exemption under Subsection (a)(1). A form promulgated under this subsection must:

(1) be in English with an integrated Spanish translation that can be readily understood by the public and the court; and

(2) include instructions for the use of the form.

(d) A court shall accept a form promulgated under Subsection (c) unless the form has been completed in a manner that causes a substantive defect that cannot be cured.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 15.01, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 22.005. DISQUALIFICATION OF JUSTICES. (a) The chief justice may certify to the governor when one or more justices of the supreme court have recused themselves under the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure or are disqualified under the constitution and laws of this state to hear and determine a case in the court.

(b) The governor immediately shall commission the requisite number of persons who are active appellate or district court justices or judges and who possess the qualifications prescribed for justices of the supreme court to try and determine the case.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 428, Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 1995.

Sec. 22.006. ADJOURNMENT. (a) The supreme court may adjourn from day to day or for the periods that it deems necessary to the ends of justice and the determination of the business before the court.

(b) A suit, process, or matter returned to or pending in the supreme court may not be discontinued because a quorum of the court is not present at the commencement or on any other day of the term. If a quorum of the court is not present on any day of the term, a justice of the court or the bailiff attending the court may adjourn the court from time to time.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.007. PETITION FOR REVIEW. (a) The supreme court may act on petitions for review when the court deems it expedient.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

(e) The granting of a petition for review admits the case into the supreme court, and the supreme court shall proceed with the case as provided by law. The denial or dismissal of a petition for review has the effect of denying the admission of the case into the supreme court, except that a motion for rehearing may be made in the same manner that a motion for rehearing to the supreme court is made in a case in which the court granted review. The denial or dismissal of a petition for review may not be regarded as a precedent or authority.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 22.008. PUBLICATION OF DECISIONS. (a) The supreme court shall appoint one or more licensed attorneys to serve at the will of the court and to report the decisions of the supreme court.

(b) The supreme court shall designate the cases to be reported and the reporter may report and publish only the designated cases. As soon as the cases are finally disposed of and the opinions are recorded, the reporter shall obtain from the proper clerk the records of the cases to be reported, with the briefs and opinions.

(c) Under the direction of the supreme court, the reporter shall promptly prepare the decisions for publication with appropriate syllabuses and statements, proper index, and table of cited cases and reported cases. Each report shall incorporate only the main propositions made in the briefs and considered by the court in the opinion, with the authorities cited in support of the propositions.

(d) The reporter shall return the record, with briefs and opinions, to the clerk when the report is completed and from time to time shall deliver the reports to the comptroller for publication. Each volume shall be copyrighted in the name of the reporter, who immediately on delivery of the edition shall transfer and assign it to the state. The edition shall be electrotyped. The state owns the plates, and the comptroller shall preserve them.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.43, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 22.009. STENOGRAPHERS; BAILIFF. The supreme court may appoint not more than three stenographers and may appoint a bailiff to attend the court when it is sitting.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.010. SEALING OF COURT RECORDS. The supreme court shall adopt rules establishing guidelines for the courts of this state to use in determining whether in the interest of justice the records in a civil case, including settlements, should be sealed.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 426, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 22.011. JUDICIAL INSTRUCTION RELATED TO FAMILY VIOLENCE, SEXUAL ASSAULT, TRAFFICKING OF PERSONS, AND CHILD ABUSE. (a) The supreme court shall provide judicial training related to the problems of family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, and child abuse and to issues concerning sex offender characteristics.

(d) The instruction must include information about:

(1) statutory and case law relating to videotaping a child's testimony and relating to competency of children to testify;

(2) methods for eliminating the trauma to the child caused by the court process;

(3) case law, statutory law, and procedural rules relating to family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, and child abuse;

(4) methods for providing protection for victims of family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, or child abuse;

(5) available community and state resources for counseling and other aid to victims and to offenders;

(6) gender bias in the judicial process;

(7) dynamics and effects of being a victim of family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, or child abuse; and

(8) issues concerning sex offender characteristics.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 795, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 282, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 254, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 332 (H.B. 10), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 22.012. TRAINING RELATED TO DIVERSIONS. (a) Each attorney representing the state in the prosecution of felonies and each district court judge shall, as an official duty, each year complete a course of instruction related to the diversion of offenders from confinement in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

(b) The supreme court shall adopt rules to provide for the training required by Subsection (a). In adopting the rules, the court shall consult with the Texas Department of Criminal Justice to obtain the department's recommendations for instruction content.

(c) The instruction must include information relating to:

(1) case law, statutory law, and procedural rules relating to felony diversions; and

(2) available community and state resources for diversions.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 11.09(a), eff. Aug. 29, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.063, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 22.013. JUDICIAL INSTRUCTION RELATED TO GUARDIANSHIP ISSUES. (a) The supreme court shall provide a course of instruction that relates to issues that arise in guardianship cases for judges involved in those cases.

(b) The supreme court shall adopt the rules necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(c) The instruction must include information about:

(1) statutory and case law relating to guardianships;

(2) the aging process and the nature of disabilities;

(3) the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. Section 12101 et seq.) and related case and statutory law, rules, and compliance methods;

(4) the principles of equal access and accommodation;

(5) the use of community resources for the disabled; and

(6) avoidance of stereotypes through a focus on people's individual abilities, support needs, and inherent individual value.

(d) The instruction may include information about:

(1) substantive areas of law concerning the needs of elderly persons and persons with disabilities;

(2) barriers to physical access and methods to overcome those barriers;

(3) communication needs of elderly persons and persons with disabilities and the technology available to provide access to communication;

(4) duties and responsibilities of guardians, guardians ad litem, attorneys, and court personnel in guardianship proceedings;

(5) standard definitions and procedures for determining incapacity;

(6) standards for surrogate decision making;

(7) the doctrine of the least-restrictive alternative;

(8) the dispute resolution process, especially its application to elderly persons and persons with disabilities; and

(9) successful programs and funding efforts for addressing the court-related needs of elderly persons and persons with disabilities.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 905, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 22.0133. JUDICIAL, COURT INVESTIGATOR, AND COURT VISITOR TRAINING RELATED TO GUARDIANSHIPS. The supreme court, in consultation with the Judicial Branch Certification Commission, shall ensure that at least one hour of training related to alternatives to guardianships and supports and services that are available to a proposed ward is provided to each judge with jurisdiction to hear a guardianship proceeding, each court investigator appointed under Section 1054.156, Estates Code, and each court visitor appointed under Section 1054.103, Estates Code, at least once every two years.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 939 (S.B. 1624), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 22.0135. JUDICIAL GUIDANCE RELATED TO CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES CASES AND JUVENILE CASES. (a) The supreme court, in conjunction with the Supreme Court of Texas Permanent Judicial Commission for Children, Youth and Families, annually shall provide guidance to judges who preside over child protective services cases or juvenile cases to establish greater uniformity across the state for:

(1) in child protective services cases, issues related to:

(A) placement of children with severe mental health issues;

(B) changes in placement; and

(C) final termination of parental rights; and

(2) in juvenile cases, issues related to:

(A) placement of children with severe mental health issues;

(B) the release of children detained in juvenile detention facilities;

(C) certification of juveniles to stand trial as adults;

(D) a child's appearance before a court in a judicial proceeding, including the use of a restraint on the child and the clothing worn by the child during the proceeding; and

(E) commitment of children to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department.

(b) The supreme court shall adopt the rules necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 844 (H.B. 2737), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 22.014. SENIOR JUSTICE ACTING FOR CHIEF JUSTICE. In the chief justice's absence, the justice with the most seniority on the supreme court may sign a court document for the chief justice if the chief justice has given that justice written authorization.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 356, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 22.015. PERMANENT PLACE DESIGNATIONS. (a) The supreme court is composed of a chief justice and of eight justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(b) The designation of offices and places under this section identifies the offices and places for all purposes, including identification on official ballots for primary and general elections.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 22.017. GRANTS BY COMMISSIONS ESTABLISHED BY SUPREME COURT. (a) In this section:

(1) "Children's commission" means the Permanent Judicial Commission for Children, Youth and Families established by the supreme court.

(2) "Mental health commission" means the Texas Judicial Commission on Mental Health established by the supreme court.

(b) The children's commission shall develop and administer a program to provide grants from available funds for initiatives that will:

(1) improve well-being, safety, and permanency outcomes in child protection cases; or

(2) enhance due process for the parties or the timeliness of resolution in cases involving the welfare of a child.

(c) The children's commission may develop and administer a program to provide grants from available funds for:

(1) initiatives designed to prevent or minimize the involvement of children in the juvenile justice system or promote the rehabilitation of children involved in the juvenile justice system; and

(2) any other initiatives identified by the children's commission or the supreme court to improve the administration of justice for children.

(d) To be eligible for a grant administered by the children's commission under this section, a prospective recipient must:

(1) use the grant money to:

(A) improve well-being, safety, or permanency outcomes in child protection cases;

(B) enhance due process for the parties or the timeliness of resolution in cases involving the welfare of a child;

(C) prevent or minimize the involvement of children in the juvenile justice system or promote the rehabilitation of children involved in the juvenile justice system; or

(D) accomplish any other initiatives identified by the children's commission or the supreme court to improve the administration of justice for children; and

(2) apply for the grant in accordance with procedures developed by the children's commission and comply with any other requirements of the supreme court.

(e) The mental health commission may develop and administer a program to provide grants from available funds for initiatives that will improve the administration of justice for individuals with mental health needs or an intellectual or developmental disability.

(f) To be eligible for a grant administered by the mental health commission under this section, a prospective recipient must:

(1) use the grant money to improve the administration of justice for individuals with mental health needs or an intellectual or developmental disability; and

(2) apply for the grant in accordance with procedures developed by the mental health commission and comply with any other requirements of the supreme court.

(g) If the children's commission or the mental health commission awards a grant under this section, the commission administering the grant shall:

(1) direct the comptroller to distribute the grant money; and

(2) monitor the use of the grant money.

(h) The children's commission and the mental health commission may accept gifts, grants, and donations for purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 8.02, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 12.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 22.018. PROMULGATION OF FORMS FOR CERTAIN EXPEDITED FORECLOSURE PROCEEDINGS. The supreme court shall promulgate the following forms for use in expedited foreclosure proceedings described by Section 50(r), Article XVI, Texas Constitution:

(1) a form for application for an expedited foreclosure proceeding;

(2) a form for a supporting affidavit; and

(3) a form for any court-required citation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1044 (H.B. 2978), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 22.019. PROMULGATION OF CERTAIN LANDLORD-TENANT FORMS. (a) The supreme court shall, as the court finds appropriate, promulgate forms for use by individuals representing themselves in residential landlord-tenant matters and instructions for the proper use of each form or set of forms.

(b) The forms and instructions must:

(1) be written in plain language that is easy to understand by the general public;

(2) clearly and conspicuously state that the form is not a substitute for the advice of an attorney;

(3) be made readily available to the general public in the manner prescribed by the supreme court; and

(4) be translated into the Spanish language, and the Spanish language translation of the form must either:

(A) state that the Spanish language-translated form is to be used solely for the purpose of assisting in understanding the form and may not be submitted to the court, and that the English version of the form must be submitted to the court; or

(B) be incorporated into the English language form in a manner that is understandable to both the court and members of the public.

(c) The clerk of a court shall inform members of the public of the availability of the form as appropriate and make the form available free of charge.

(d) A court shall accept a form promulgated by the supreme court under this section unless the form has been completed in a manner that causes a substantive defect that cannot be cured.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 600 (S.B. 478), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 22.020. PROMULGATION OF CERTAIN PROBATE FORMS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Probate court" has the meaning assigned by Section 22.007, Estates Code.

(2) "Probate matter" has the meaning assigned by Section 22.029, Estates Code.

(3) "Transfer on death deed" has the meaning assigned by Section 114.002, Estates Code.

(b) The supreme court shall, as the court considers appropriate, promulgate:

(1) forms for use by individuals representing themselves in certain probate matters, including forms for use in:

(A) a small estate affidavit proceeding under Chapter 205, Estates Code; and

(B) the probate of a will as a muniment of title under Chapter 257, Estates Code;

(2) a simple will form for:

(A) a married individual with an adult child;

(B) a married individual with a minor child;

(C) a married individual with no children;

(D) an unmarried individual with an adult child;

(E) an unmarried individual with a minor child; and

(F) an unmarried individual with no children;

(2-a) a form for use to create a transfer on death deed and a form for use to create an instrument of revocation of a transfer on death deed under Chapter 114, Estates Code; and

(3) instructions for the proper use of each form or set of forms.

(c) The forms and instructions:

(1) must be written in plain language that is easy to understand by the general public;

(2) shall be made readily available to the general public in the manner prescribed by the supreme court; and

(3) must be translated into the Spanish language as provided by Subsection (d).

(d) The Spanish language translation of a form must:

(1) state:

(A) that the Spanish language translated form is to be used solely for the purpose of assisting in understanding the form and may not be submitted to the probate court; and

(B) that the English language version of the form must be submitted to the probate court; or

(2) be incorporated into the English language version of the form in a manner that is understandable to both the probate court and members of the general public.

(e) Each form and its instructions must clearly and conspicuously state that the form is not a substitute for the advice of an attorney.

(f) The clerk of a probate court shall inform members of the general public of the availability of a form promulgated by the supreme court under this section as appropriate and make the form available free of charge.

(g) A probate court shall accept a form promulgated by the supreme court under this section unless the form has been completed in a manner that causes a substantive defect that cannot be cured.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 602 (S.B. 512), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 337 (S.B. 874), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 337 (S.B. 874), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 22.022. JUDICIAL INSTRUCTION RELATED TO FOREIGN LAW AND FOREIGN JUDGMENTS. (a) The supreme court shall provide for a course of instruction that relates to issues regarding foreign law, foreign judgments, and arbitration awards in relation to foreign law that arise in actions under the Family Code involving the marriage relationship and the parent-child relationship for judges involved in those actions.

(b) The course of instruction must include information about:

(1) the limits on comity and the freedom to contract for arbitration that protect against violations of constitutional rights and public policy in the application of foreign law and the recognition and enforcement of foreign judgments and arbitration awards in actions brought under the Family Code; and

(2) the rules of evidence and procedure adopted under Section 22.0041.

(c) The supreme court shall adopt rules necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 771 (H.B. 45), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. COURT OF CRIMINAL APPEALS

Sec. 22.101. SEAL. (a) The court of criminal appeals shall use a seal on which there is engraved a star with five points and the words "Court of Criminal Appeals of Texas."

(b) The writs and processes issued from the court of criminal appeals shall bear the name of the presiding judge and the seal of the court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.102. MANDATE. When the court from which an appeal is taken is deprived of jurisdiction over the case pending the appeal and the case is determined by a court of appeals or the court of criminal appeals, the mandate of the appellate court that determined the case shall be directed to the court that had jurisdiction over the case, as also provided by Section 22.226.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.103. ASCERTAINMENT OF FACTS. The court of criminal appeals may ascertain, on affidavit or otherwise, the matters of fact that are necessary to the exercise of its jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.105. DISQUALIFICATION. (a) The fact that a judge of the court of criminal appeals is disqualified under the constitution and laws of this state to hear and determine a case shall be certified to the governor.

(b) The governor immediately shall commission a person who is learned in the law to act in the place of the disqualified judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.106. COMMISSIONERS OF COURT OF CRIMINAL APPEALS. (a) The presiding judge of the court of criminal appeals, with the concurrence of a majority of the judges of the court of criminal appeals, may designate and appoint a retired appellate judge or district judge who has consented to be subject to appointment, or an active appellate judge or district judge, to sit as a commissioner of the court of criminal appeals. A designated judge must consent to the designation and appointment. The presiding judge may designate and appoint as many commissioners as he deems necessary to aid the court in disposing of its business.

(b) A commissioner shall discharge the duties that are assigned him by the court and may be appointed to serve either for a certain period of time or for a particular case or cases.

(c) The opinions of a commissioner shall be submitted to the court of criminal appeals for approval. When approved by a majority of the court, an opinion of a commissioner has the same weight and legal effect as an opinion originally prepared by the court of criminal appeals.

(d) The compensation of a judge while sitting as a commissioner of the court of criminal appeals shall be paid out of money appropriated from the general revenue fund for that purpose in an amount equal to the salary of the judges of the court of criminal appeals and shall be in lieu of the retirement allowance that the judge receives or in lieu of the compensation he receives as an active judge of another court. In addition to the compensation, a judge sitting as a commissioner of the court is entitled to receive his actual travel expenses to and from Austin and a $25 per diem while he is assigned to the court of criminal appeals in Austin.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.107. COMMISSION IN AID OF COURT OF CRIMINAL APPEALS. (a) In addition to the authority granted by Section 22.106 of this code, the court of criminal appeals may appoint a commission for the aid of the court in disposing of the business before the court. The commission in aid of the court shall discharge the duties that are assigned it by the court of criminal appeals.

(b) The commission shall be composed of two attorneys having the qualifications fixed by the constitution and laws of this state for a judge of the court of criminal appeals. Commissioners serve two-year terms that expire September 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(c) The opinions of the commissioners in aid of the court shall be submitted to the court of criminal appeals for approval. When approved by a majority of the court and handed down as an opinion of the court, an opinion of a commissioner in aid of the court has the same weight and legal effect as an opinion originally prepared and handed down by the court of criminal appeals.

(d) Each member of the commission is entitled to receive for his services the salary that is provided by law.

(e) The court of criminal appeals by appointment may fill a vacancy on the commission in aid of the court that is created by the death, resignation, or removal of a member of the commission. A person appointed to fill a vacancy continues in office for the unexpired portion of the term for which the commissioner vacating the office was appointed.

(f) The court of criminal appeals shall appoint two stenographers for the commission.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.108. RULES OF APPELLATE PROCEDURE IN CRIMINAL CASES. (a) The court of criminal appeals is granted rulemaking power to promulgate rules of posttrial, appellate, and review procedure in criminal cases except that its rules may not abridge, enlarge, or modify the substantive rights of a litigant.

(b) The court of criminal appeals may promulgate a comprehensive body of rules of posttrial, appellate, and review procedure in criminal cases and from time to time may promulgate a specific rule or rules of posttrial, appellate, or review procedure in criminal cases or an amendment or amendments to a specific rule or rules. Rules and amendments adopted under this subsection are effective at the time the court of criminal appeals considers expedient in the interest of a proper administration of justice. The rules and amendments to rules remain in effect unless and until disapproved, modified, or changed by the legislature. The clerk of the court of criminal appeals shall file with the secretary of state the rules or amendments to rules promulgated by the court of criminal appeals under this subsection.

(c) The rules of posttrial, appellate, and review procedure in criminal cases shall be published in the Texas Register and in the Texas Bar Journal. The court of criminal appeals may adopt the method it considers expedient for the printing and distribution of the rules.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.04(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 297, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 22.109. RULES OF EVIDENCE IN CRIMINAL CASES. (a) The court of criminal appeals has the full rulemaking power in the promulgation of rules of evidence in the trials of criminal cases, except that its rules may not abridge, enlarge, or modify the substantive rights of a litigant.

(b) The court of criminal appeals may promulgate a comprehensive body of rules of evidence in the trials of criminal cases and from time to time may promulgate a specific rule or rules of evidence or an amendment or amendments to a specific rule or rules. Rules and amendments adopted under this subsection are effective at the time the court of criminal appeals considers expedient in the interest of a proper administration of justice. The rules and amendments to rules remain in effect unless and until disapproved by the legislature. The secretary of state shall report the rules or amendments to rules to the next regular session of the legislature by mailing a copy of the rules or amendments to rules to each elected member of the legislature on or before December 1 immediately preceding the session.

(c) The rules of evidence in the trials of criminal cases shall be published in the Texas Register and in the Texas Bar Journal. The court of criminal appeals may adopt the method it considers expedient for the printing and distribution of the rules.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.04(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 22.1095. RULES ON ELECTRONIC FILING OF DOCUMENTS FOR CAPITAL CASES IN COURT OF CRIMINAL APPEALS. (a) Notwithstanding Subchapter I, Chapter 51, or any other law, the court of criminal appeals may adopt rules and procedures providing for and governing the electronic filing of briefs, pleadings, and other documents for capital cases in that court.

(b) In the adoption of rules and procedures under Subsection (a), the court of criminal appeals shall coordinate with the supreme court and the rules and procedures adopted by that court.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 199 (H.B. 4314), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 22.110. JUDICIAL INSTRUCTION RELATED TO FAMILY VIOLENCE, SEXUAL ASSAULT, TRAFFICKING OF PERSONS, AND CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT. (a) The court of criminal appeals shall assure that judicial training related to the problems of family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, and child abuse and neglect is provided.

(b) The court of criminal appeals shall adopt the rules necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section. The rules must require:

(1) each district judge, judge of a statutory county court, associate judge appointed under Chapter 54A of this code or Chapter 201, Family Code, master, referee, and magistrate within the judge's first term of office or the judicial officer's first four years of service to complete and provide certification of completion of 12 hours of training that include at least:

(A) four hours dedicated to issues related to trafficking of persons and child abuse and neglect that cover at least two of the topics described in Subsections (d)(8)-(12);

(B) six hours dedicated to the training described by Subsections (d)(5), (6), and (7); and

(C) one hour dedicated to the training described by Subsection (d)(13);

(2) each judge and judicial officer during each additional term in office or four years of service to complete and provide certification of completion of an additional five hours of training that include at least:

(A) two hours dedicated to the training described by Subsections (d)(11) and (12); and

(B) one hour dedicated to the training described by Subsection (d)(13); and

(3) each judge of a court with primary responsibility for family law or family violence matters to complete and provide certification of completion of an additional hour of training described by Subsection (d)(13) every two years.

(c) In adopting the rules, the court of criminal appeals may consult with the supreme court and with professional groups and associations in the state that have expertise in the subject matter to obtain the recommendations of those groups or associations for instruction content.

(d) The instruction must include information about:

(1) statutory and case law relating to videotaping a child's testimony and relating to competency of children to testify;

(2) methods for eliminating the trauma to the child caused by the court process;

(3) case law, statutory law, and procedural rules relating to family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, and child abuse and neglect;

(4) methods for providing protection for victims of family violence, sexual assault, trafficking of persons, and child abuse and neglect;

(5) available community and state resources for counseling and other aid to victims and to offenders;

(6) gender bias in the judicial process;

(7) dynamics and effects of being a victim of sexual assault, trafficking of persons, or child abuse and neglect;

(8) dynamics of sexual abuse of children, including child abuse accommodation syndrome and grooming;

(9) impact of substance abuse on an unborn child and on a person's ability to care for a child;

(10) issues of attachment and bonding between children and caregivers;

(11) issues of child development that pertain to trafficking of persons and child abuse and neglect;

(12) medical findings regarding physical abuse, sexual abuse, trafficking of persons, and child abuse and neglect; and

(13) dynamics of family violence.

(d-1) The sponsoring organization for any training on issues related to child abuse and neglect must have at least three years' experience in training professionals on child abuse and neglect issues or have personnel or planning committee members who have at least five years' experience in working directly in the field of child abuse and neglect prevention and treatment.

(d-2) The training described by Subsection (d)(13) must be developed in consultation with a statewide family violence advocacy organization.

(e) The court of criminal appeals or the court's designee shall report the name of a judge or judicial officer who does not comply with the requirements of this section to the State Commission on Judicial Conduct.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 507, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 390, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 3505), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 6.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 332 (H.B. 10), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 332 (H.B. 10), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 275 (S.B. 855), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 22.1105. JUDICIAL INSTRUCTION RELATED TO CERTAIN ALLEGED CHILD OFFENDERS. (a) Each judge of a court with jurisdiction to hear a complaint against a child alleging a violation of a misdemeanor offense punishable by fine only, other than a traffic offense or public intoxication or a violation of a penal ordinance of a political subdivision other than a traffic offense, shall complete a course of instruction related to youth diversion and understanding relevant issues of child welfare, including issues related to mental health and children with disabilities, every judicial academic year that ends in a 0 or a 5.

(b) The court of criminal appeals shall adopt the rules necessary to provide for the training required under Subsection (a). The rules must require a judge described by Subsection (a) to complete two hours of the required training every judicial academic year that ends in a 0 or a 5 as part of the training the judge is required to complete under rules adopted by the court of criminal appeals or other law.

(c) In adopting the rules, the court of criminal appeals may consult with the supreme court and with professional groups and associations in this state that have expertise in the subject matter to obtain the recommendations of those groups or associations for instructional content.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 250 (H.B. 1793), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 525 (H.B. 3186), Sec. 13, eff. January 1, 2024.

Sec. 22.1106. JUDICIAL INSTRUCTION RELATED TO COURT-ORDERED OUTPATIENT MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES. The court of criminal appeals shall ensure that judicial training related to court-ordered outpatient mental health services is provided at least once every year. The instruction may be provided at the annual Judicial Education Conference.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 582 (S.B. 362), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 22.111. TRAINING FOR PROSECUTING ATTORNEYS RELATED TO PUNISHMENT ENHANCEMENT BECAUSE OF BIAS OR PREJUDICE. The court of criminal appeals shall provide to prosecuting attorneys training related to the use of Section 12.47, Penal Code, and Article 42.014, Code of Criminal Procedure, for enhancing punishment on a finding that an offense was committed because of the defendant's bias or prejudice as defined in Article 42.014, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 85, Sec. 7.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 22.112. PERMANENT PLACE DESIGNATIONS. (a) The court of criminal appeals is composed of a presiding judge and of eight judges holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(b) The designation of offices and places under this section identifies the offices and places for all purposes, including identification on official ballots for primary and general elections.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER C. COURTS OF APPEALS

Sec. 22.201. COURTS OF APPEALS DISTRICTS. (a) The state is organized into 15 courts of appeals districts with a court of appeals in each district.

(b) The First Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Austin, Brazoria, Chambers, Colorado, Fort Bend, Galveston, Grimes, Harris, Waller, and Washington.

(c) The Second Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Archer, Clay, Cooke, Denton, Hood, Jack, Montague, Parker, Tarrant, Wichita, Wise, and Young.

(d) The Third Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Bastrop, Bell, Blanco, Burnet, Caldwell, Coke, Comal, Concho, Fayette, Hays, Irion, Lampasas, Lee, Llano, McCulloch, Milam, Mills, Runnels, San Saba, Schleicher, Sterling, Tom Green, Travis, and Williamson.

(e) The Fourth Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Atascosa, Bandera, Bexar, Brooks, Dimmit, Duval, Edwards, Frio, Gillespie, Guadalupe, Jim Hogg, Jim Wells, Karnes, Kendall, Kerr, Kimble, Kinney, LaSalle, McMullen, Mason, Maverick, Medina, Menard, Real, Starr, Sutton, Uvalde, Val Verde, Webb, Wilson, Zapata, and Zavala.

(f) The Fifth Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Collin, Dallas, Grayson, Hunt, Kaufman, and Rockwall.

(g) The Sixth Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Bowie, Camp, Cass, Delta, Fannin, Franklin, Gregg, Harrison, Hopkins, Hunt, Lamar, Marion, Morris, Panola, Red River, Rusk, Titus, Upshur, and Wood.

(h) The Seventh Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Armstrong, Bailey, Briscoe, Carson, Castro, Childress, Cochran, Collingsworth, Cottle, Crosby, Dallam, Deaf Smith, Dickens, Donley, Floyd, Foard, Garza, Gray, Hale, Hall, Hansford, Hardeman, Hartley, Hemphill, Hockley, Hutchinson, Kent, King, Lamb, Lipscomb, Lubbock, Lynn, Moore, Motley, Ochiltree, Oldham, Parmer, Potter, Randall, Roberts, Sherman, Swisher, Terry, Wilbarger, Wheeler, and Yoakum.

(i) The Eighth Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Andrews, Brewster, Crane, Crockett, Culberson, El Paso, Hudspeth, Jeff Davis, Loving, Pecos, Presidio, Reagan, Reeves, Terrell, Upton, Ward, and Winkler.

(j) The Ninth Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Hardin, Jasper, Jefferson, Liberty, Montgomery, Newton, Orange, Polk, San Jacinto, and Tyler.

(k) The Tenth Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Bosque, Burleson, Brazos, Coryell, Ellis, Falls, Freestone, Hamilton, Hill, Johnson, Leon, Limestone, Madison, McLennan, Navarro, Robertson, Somervell, and Walker.

(l) The Eleventh Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Baylor, Borden, Brown, Callahan, Coleman, Comanche, Dawson, Eastland, Ector, Erath, Fisher, Gaines, Glasscock, Haskell, Howard, Jones, Knox, Martin, Midland, Mitchell, Nolan, Palo Pinto, Scurry, Shackelford, Stephens, Stonewall, Taylor, and Throckmorton.

(m) The Twelfth Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Anderson, Angelina, Cherokee, Gregg, Henderson, Houston, Nacogdoches, Rains, Rusk, Sabine, San Augustine, Shelby, Smith, Trinity, Upshur, Van Zandt, and Wood.

(n) The Thirteenth Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Aransas, Bee, Calhoun, Cameron, DeWitt, Goliad, Gonzales, Hidalgo, Jackson, Kenedy, Kleberg, Lavaca, Live Oak, Matagorda, Nueces, Refugio, San Patricio, Victoria, Wharton, and Willacy.

(o) The Fourteenth Court of Appeals District is composed of the counties of Austin, Brazoria, Chambers, Colorado, Fort Bend, Galveston, Grimes, Harris, Waller, and Washington.

(p) The Fifteenth Court of Appeals District is composed of all counties in this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 44, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 315, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 662, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 542 (H.B. 1077), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 459 (S.B. 1045), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 22.202. FIRST COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the First Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Houston.

(b) Harris County shall furnish and equip suitable rooms in Houston for the court and the justices without expense to the state.

(c) The counties other than Harris County composing the First and Fourteenth Courts of Appeals Districts shall annually reimburse Harris County for the costs incurred by Harris County during its previous fiscal year for:

(1) supplemental salaries and fringe benefits for the justices for those courts; and

(2) furnishings, equipment, supplies, and utility expenses for those courts.

(d) Each county shall pay a share based on the proportion its population bears to the total population of all the counties in those districts. A county shall pay its share not later than the 60th day after the beginning of the county's fiscal year.

(e) The Commissioners Court of Harris County shall provide each county liable for the expenses with a statement of that county's share. The statement must be approved by the chief justices of the courts of appeals of the First and Fourteenth Courts of Appeals Districts.

(f) The First and Fourteenth Courts of Appeals shall establish a central clerk's office and offices for justices and other support personnel in Houston. The courts may establish offices for the clerks, justices, and other support personnel in other counties in the courts' district as each court determines necessary and convenient.

(g) The First Court of Appeals may transact its business in any county in the First Court of Appeals District as the court determines necessary and convenient.

(h) All civil and criminal cases directed to the First or Fourteenth Court of Appeals shall be filed in either the First or Fourteenth Court of Appeals as provided by this section. The trial clerk shall write the numbers of the two courts of appeals on identical slips of paper and place the slips in a container. When a notice of appeal or appeal bond is filed, the trial court clerk shall draw a number from the container at random, in a public place, and shall assign the case and any companion cases to the court of appeals for the corresponding number drawn.

(i) Subject to Subchapter A, Chapter 73, the clerks of the First and the Fourteenth Courts of Appeals Districts may from time to time equalize the dockets of the two courts by transferring cases from one court to the other. The court to which the case is transferred has jurisdiction over the matter.

(j) Each of the justices on the court of appeals shall designate the county of his permanent residence on the records of the court in which the justice serves. The county of a justice's permanent residence is the justice's permanent post of duty.

(j-1) Expired.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.03 to 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 22.203. SECOND COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Second Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Fort Worth.

(b) The court may transact its business in any county in the district as the court determines is necessary or convenient.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 4.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 4.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 4.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 4.

(g) If any additional offices of justices of the court are created, the designation for those offices shall be in consecutive numerical order beginning with Place 8. If two or more offices of justice are created to take effect the same date, and the legislature does not specify places for those offices, the court shall by rule determine places for each office. If the court does not determine places before a person is appointed or elected to fill the initial vacancy, the places are determined by the seniority system established as provided by Subsection (f).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.08, 2.05(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 22.204. THIRD COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Third Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Austin.

(b) The court may transact its business at the county seat of any of the counties within its district as the court determines is necessary and convenient, except that all cases originating in Travis County shall be heard and transacted in that county.

(c) The counties other than Travis County composing the Third Court of Appeals District shall annually reimburse Travis County for the costs incurred by Travis County during its previous fiscal year for supplemental salaries and fringe benefits for the justices of that court of appeals.

(d) Each county, including Travis County, shall pay a share based on the proportion its population bears to the total population of all the counties in the district according to the most recent federal census.

(e) A county shall pay its share not later than the 60th day after the beginning of the county's fiscal year.

(f) The Commissioners Court of Travis County shall provide each county liable for the reimbursement with a statement of that county's share. The statement must be approved by the chief justice of the Court of Appeals for the Third Court of Appeals District.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.09, 2.06(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 22.205. FOURTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Fourth Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of San Antonio.

(b) The court may transact its business at the county seat of any of the counties within its district, as the court determines is necessary and convenient, except that all cases originating in Bexar County that the court hears shall be heard and transacted in that county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.07(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 99, Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 1991.

Sec. 22.206. FIFTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Fifth Court of Appeals District shall be primarily held in the City of Dallas.

(b) The court may transact its business in any county in the district as the court determines is necessary and convenient.

(c) The court may establish offices for the clerk, justices, and other support personnel in any county in the district and in more than one location in any county in the district as the court determines is necessary and convenient.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 210, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 22.207. SIXTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Sixth Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Texarkana.

(b) The court may transact its business in the City of Texarkana or the county seat of any county in the district as the court determines is necessary or convenient, except that all cases originating in Bowie County shall be heard and transacted in the City of Texarkana.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 542, Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 153, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 542 (H.B. 1077), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 22.208. SEVENTH COURT OF APPEALS. The Court of Appeals for the Seventh Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Amarillo.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.12, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 22.209. EIGHTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Eighth Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of El Paso.

(b) The court may transact its business at the county seat of any county in the district as the court determines is necessary and convenient, except all cases originating in El Paso County shall be heard and transacted in that county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.13, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 22.210. NINTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Ninth Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Beaumont.

(b) The City of Beaumont shall furnish and equip suitable rooms for the court and the justices without expense to the state.

(c) The court may transact its business in the City of Beaumont or the county seat of any county in the district as the court determines is necessary or convenient.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.14, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 22, Sec. 1, eff. May 12, 2003.

Sec. 22.211. TENTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Tenth Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Waco or in the county seat of any county located within the Tenth Court of Appeals District.

(b) The City of Waco shall furnish and equip suitable rooms for the court and the justices without expense to the state.

(c) Each of the justices on the court of appeals shall designate the county of his permanent residence on the records of the court in which the justice serves. The county of a justice's permanent residence is the justice's permanent post of duty.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.15, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 729, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 22.212. ELEVENTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Eleventh Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Eastland.

(b) Eastland County shall furnish and equip suitable rooms for the court and the justices without expense to the state.

(c) The court may transact its business in the City of Eastland or in any county in the district as the court determines is necessary or convenient.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.16, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1366 (H.B. 1586), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 22.213. TWELFTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Twelfth Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Tyler.

(b) The City of Tyler and Smith County shall furnish and equip suitable rooms and a library for the court and the justices without expense to the state.

(c) The court may transact its business in the City of Tyler or at the county seat of any county in the district as the court determines is necessary or convenient, except that all cases originating in Smith County shall be heard and transacted in the City of Tyler.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 542, Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.17, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 604, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 647, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 542 (H.B. 1077), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 22.214. THIRTEENTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Thirteenth Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Corpus Christi and the City of Edinburg.

(b) Nueces County shall furnish and equip suitable rooms in the City of Corpus Christi and Hidalgo County shall furnish and equip suitable rooms in the City of Edinburg for the court and the justices without expense to the state.

(c) The court may transact its business at the county seat of any county in the district as the court determines is necessary and convenient, except that:

(1) all cases originating in Nueces County shall be heard and transacted in Nueces County; and

(2) all cases originating in Cameron, Hidalgo, or Willacy County shall be heard and transacted in Cameron, Hidalgo, or Willacy County.

(d) The commissioners courts of the counties in the district by adopting concurrent orders may authorize the payment of an automobile allowance in an amount not to exceed $15,000 annually to each of the justices of the court for automobile expenses incurred in performing official duties.

(e) The automobile allowance authorized by Subsection (d) is not subject to:

(1) the limitations on additional compensation paid to a justice of a court of appeals district imposed by Section 31.003; or

(2) the salary differentials provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 659.

(f) Nueces County shall each fiscal year pay the total amount of the supplemental salaries, car allowances, and fringe benefits to the justices of the court. Each county composing the district, except Nueces County, shall annually reimburse Nueces County for that county's portion of the total amount paid under this subsection by Nueces County during the preceding fiscal year. Each county in the district, including Nueces County, is liable for a share of the total amount paid, based on the proportion that county's population bears to the total population of all the counties in the district.

(g) The Commissioners Court of Nueces County shall provide to each county liable for the reimbursement under Subsection (f) a statement of that county's share. The statement must be approved by the chief justice of the Court of Appeals for the Thirteenth Court of Appeals District. A county shall pay its share of the reimbursement not later than the 60th day after the beginning of the county's fiscal year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.18, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1037, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1177, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 22.215. FOURTEENTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Fourteenth Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Houston.

(b) Harris County shall furnish and equip suitable rooms in Houston for the court and the justices without expense to the state.

(c) The Fourteenth Court of Appeals may transact its business in any county in the First Court of Appeals District as the court determines necessary and convenient.

(d) Each of the justices on the court of appeals shall designate the county of his permanent residence on the records of the court in which the justice serves. The county of a justice's permanent residence is the justice's permanent post of duty.

(e) Section 22.202, relating to the First Court of Appeals, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Fourteenth Court of Appeals.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.19, 1.20, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 22.2151. FIFTEENTH COURT OF APPEALS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District shall be held in the City of Austin.

(b) The Fifteenth Court of Appeals may transact its business in any county in the district as the court determines is necessary and convenient.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 459 (S.B. 1045), Sec. 1.02, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 22.2152. REPORT ON FIFTEENTH COURT OF APPEALS. Not later than December 1 of each year, the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System shall submit to the legislature a report on the number and types of cases heard by the Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District in the preceding state fiscal year.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 459 (S.B. 1045), Sec. 1.03, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 22.216. MEMBERSHIP; PERMANENT PLACE DESIGNATIONS. (a) The Court of Appeals for the First Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of eight justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(b) The Court of Appeals for the Second Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of six justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(c) The Court of Appeals for the Third Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of five justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(d) The Court of Appeals for the Fourth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of six justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(e) The Court of Appeals for the Fifth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of 12 justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(f) The Court of Appeals for the Sixth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of two justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(g) The Court of Appeals for the Seventh Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of three justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(h) The Court of Appeals for the Eighth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of two justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(i) The Court of Appeals for the Ninth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of three justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(j) The Court of Appeals for the Tenth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of two justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(k) The Court of Appeals for the Eleventh Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of two justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(l) The Court of Appeals for the Twelfth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of two justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(m) The Court of Appeals for the Thirteenth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of five justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(n) The Court of Appeals for the Fourteenth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of eight justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(n-1) The Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of four justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2.

(n-2) Notwithstanding Subsection (n-1), the Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District consists of a chief justice and of two justices holding places numbered consecutively beginning with Place 2 for the first three years following the court's creation. This subsection expires September 1, 2027.

(o) The designation of offices and places under this section identifies the offices and places for all purposes, including identification on official ballots for primary and general elections.

(p) If any additional offices of justice of a court of appeals are created, the designation for those offices shall be in consecutive numerical order beginning with the next available place number. If two or more offices of justice are created to take effect the same date, and the legislature does not specify places for those offices, the applicable court of appeals shall by rule determine places for each office. If the court does not determine places before a person is appointed or elected to fill the initial vacancy, the places are determined by seniority. The chief justice of the applicable court shall file the names and place numbers of the justices with the secretary of state and the clerk of the court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.21 to 1.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 315, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 315, Sec. 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2005; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 662, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 662, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2005; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 459 (S.B. 1045), Sec. 1.04, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 22.217. DISQUALIFICATION. (a) The fact that at least two members of a court of appeals are disqualified to determine a case in the court shall be certified to the governor.

(b) The governor immediately shall commission the requisite number of persons who are learned in the law to try and determine the case.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.218. TERM OF COURT. The term of each court of appeals begins and ends with each calendar year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.219. ADJOURNMENT. (a) A court of appeals may adjourn from day to day or for the periods that it considers proper.

(b) If a quorum of a court is not present on any day of the term, a justice of the court or the bailiff attending the court may adjourn the court from time to time until a quorum is present, but the court may not be finally adjourned for the term.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.220. CIVIL JURISDICTION. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (d), each court of appeals has appellate jurisdiction of all civil cases within its district of which the district courts or county courts have jurisdiction when the amount in controversy or the judgment rendered exceeds $250, exclusive of interest and costs.

(b) If a court of appeals having jurisdiction in a case, matter, or controversy that requires immediate action is unable to take immediate action because the illness, absence, or unavailability of the justices causes fewer than three members of the court to be present, the nearest available court of appeals, under rules prescribed by the supreme court, may take the action required in the case, matter, or controversy.

(c) Each court of appeals may, on affidavit or otherwise, as the court may determine, ascertain the matters of fact that are necessary to the proper exercise of its jurisdiction.

(d) The Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District has exclusive intermediate appellate jurisdiction over the following matters arising out of or related to a civil case:

(1) matters brought by or against the state or a board, commission, department, office, or other agency in the executive branch of the state government, including a university system or institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, or by or against an officer or employee of the state or a board, commission, department, office, or other agency in the executive branch of the state government arising out of that officer's or employee's official conduct, other than:

(A) a proceeding brought under the Family Code and any related motion or proceeding;

(B) a proceeding brought under Chapter 7B or Article 17.292, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(C) a proceeding brought against a district attorney, a criminal district attorney, or a county attorney with criminal jurisdiction;

(D) a proceeding relating to a mental health commitment;

(E) a proceeding relating to civil asset forfeiture;

(F) a condemnation proceeding for the acquisition of land or a proceeding related to eminent domain;

(G) a proceeding brought under Chapter 101, Civil Practice and Remedies Code;

(H) a claim of personal injury or wrongful death;

(I) a proceeding brought under Chapter 125, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, to enjoin a common nuisance;

(J) a proceeding brought under Chapter 55, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(K) a proceeding under Chapter 22A, Government Code;

(L) a proceeding brought under Subchapter E-1, Chapter 411, Government Code;

(M) a proceeding brought under Chapter 21, Labor Code;

(N) a removal action under Chapter 87, Local Government Code; or

(O) a proceeding brought under Chapter 841, Health and Safety Code;

(2) matters in which a party to the proceeding files a petition, motion, or other pleading challenging the constitutionality or validity of a state statute or rule and the attorney general is a party to the case; and

(3) any other matter as provided by law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (S.B. 408), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 459 (S.B. 1045), Sec. 1.05, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 22.221. WRIT POWER. (a) Each court of appeals or a justice of a court of appeals may issue a writ of mandamus and all other writs necessary to enforce the jurisdiction of the court.

(b) Subject to Subsection (c-1), each court of appeals for a court of appeals district may issue all writs of mandamus, agreeable to the principles of law regulating those writs, against a judge of a district, statutory county, statutory probate county, or county court in the court of appeals district.

(c) Each court of appeals for a court of appeals district, other than the Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District, may issue all writs of mandamus, agreeable to the principles of law regulating those writs, against:

(1) a judge of a district court who is acting as a magistrate at a court of inquiry under Chapter 52, Code of Criminal Procedure, in the court of appeals district; or

(2) an associate judge of a district or county court appointed by a judge under Chapter 201, Family Code, in the court of appeals district for the judge who appointed the associate judge.

(c-1) The original jurisdiction of the Court of Appeals for the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District to issue writs is limited to writs arising out of matters over which the court has exclusive intermediate appellate jurisdiction under Section 22.220(d).

(d) Concurrently with the supreme court, the court of appeals of a court of appeals district in which a person is restrained in his liberty, or a justice of the court of appeals, may issue a writ of habeas corpus when it appears that the restraint of liberty is by virtue of an order, process, or commitment issued by a court or judge because of the violation of an order, judgment, or decree previously made, rendered, or entered by the court or judge in a civil case. Pending the hearing of an application for a writ of habeas corpus, the court of appeals or a justice of the court of appeals may admit to bail a person to whom the writ of habeas corpus may be granted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 69, Sec. 1, eff. May 6, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.35, 2.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 839, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 740 (S.B. 1233), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1013 (H.B. 1480), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 459 (S.B. 1045), Sec. 1.06, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 22.222. COURT SITTING IN PANELS. (a) Each court of appeals may sit in panels of not fewer than three justices for the purpose of hearing cases.

(b) If more than one panel is used, the court of appeals shall establish rules to periodically rotate the justices among the panels. Permanent civil panels and criminal panels without rotation may not be established.

(c) A majority of a panel constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and the concurrence of a majority of a panel is necessary for a decision.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.223. COURT SITTING EN BANC. (a) The chief justice of each court of appeals, under rules established by the court, shall convene the court en banc for the transaction of all business other than the hearing of cases and may convene the court en banc for the purpose of hearing cases.

(b) When convened en banc, a majority of the membership of the court constitutes a quorum and the concurrence of a majority of the court sitting en banc is necessary for a decision.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.224. SEAL. The clerk of each court of appeals shall obtain a seal for the court. The seal shall have a star with five points and the words "Court of Appeals of the State of Texas" engraved on it.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.225. EFFECT OF JUDGMENT IN CIVIL CASES. (a) A judgment of a court of appeals is conclusive on the facts of the case in all civil cases.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(3), eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(3), eff. September 1, 2017.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(3), eff. September 1, 2017.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(3), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1106, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 855, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 204, Sec. 1.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 97 (S.B. 15), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 203 (H.B. 274), Sec. 3.02, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 150 (H.B. 1761), Sec. 4(3), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 22.226. MANDATE. When the court from which an appeal is taken is deprived of jurisdiction over the case pending the appeal and the case is determined by a court of appeals or the court of criminal appeals, the mandate of the appellate court that determines the case shall be directed to the court that had jurisdiction over the case, as also provided by Section 22.102.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.228. SPECIAL COMMISSIONER. (a) The other justices of a court of appeals shall certify to the governor the following facts when they occur:

(1) a justice of the court of appeals is totally disabled to discharge any of the duties of his office because of physical or mental illness that probably is permanent, has remained in that condition continuously for at least one year, and probably will continue to be incapacitated by the illness for the balance of his term of office; or

(2) a justice of the court of appeals has been called or ordered into the active military service of the United States.

(b) On receipt of a certificate that a justice is disabled or on active military service, the governor shall investigate and verify the facts contained in the certificate. If the governor determines that the appointment of a special commissioner is necessary, he promptly shall appoint a special commissioner who has the qualifications of a member of a court of appeals to assist the court.

(c) A special commissioner may sit with the court, hear arguments on submitted cases, and write opinions on the cases if directed to do so by the court. When the opinion of a special commissioner is adopted by the court of appeals, it becomes the opinion of the court.

(d) A special commissioner appointed by the governor shall receive the same compensation as a regular justice of the courts of appeals.

(e) A special commissioner who is appointed because of the disability of a justice serves on the court until the recovery from the disability, the death, or the expiration of the term of the disabled justice, except that a special commissioner may not serve for more than two years under the same appointment. In the event of a recovery from the disability, a majority of the justices of the court of appeals shall certify to the governor that the disabled justice is recovered. The certificate of a majority of the justices is conclusive evidence of the recovery of the disabled justice.

(f) A special commissioner who is appointed because a justice is on active military service serves on the court until the discharge of the justice from the military service or the expiration of the term of the justice who is on military service, except that a special commissioner may not serve more than two years under the same appointment. When the active military service of a justice of a court of appeals is terminated, the other justices of the court shall certify the termination to the governor. The certificate of the other justices is conclusive evidence of the termination of the active military service.

(g) This section does not give the members of a court of appeals or the governor the power to remove or suspend from office a justice of a court of appeals or to interfere with a justice in his constitutional rights and powers.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.229. APPELLATE JUDICIAL SYSTEM FUND. (a) An appellate judicial system fund is established for each court of appeals, other than the Court of Appeals of the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District, to:

(1) assist the court of appeals in the processing of appeals filed with the court of appeals from the county courts, statutory county courts, statutory probate courts, and district courts in the counties the court of appeals serves; and

(2) defray costs and expenses incurred in the operation of the court of appeals.

(b) To fund the appellate judicial system each county treasurer shall allocate to the fund the percentage of the local consolidated filing fee provided by Section 135.101(b)(1) or 135.102(b)(1), Local Government Code.

(c) The fee required under Subsection (b)(2) shall be taxed, collected, and paid as other court costs in a suit. The clerk of the court shall collect the fee and pay it to the county treasurer.

(d) The county treasurer shall monthly forward the money collected under this section to the clerk of the court of appeals serving the county for deposit in the appellate judicial system fund. The court of appeals may spend money in the fund for the purposes described by Subsection (a). Money in the fund may not be used for any other purpose.

(e) The chief justice of each court of appeals is responsible for the management of all money deposited in the appellate judicial system fund for the chief justice's court of appeals and has sole discretion on use of the money in the fund, except that the money must be used for purposes consistent with the purposes described by Subsection (a) for which the fund was established.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 41), Sec. 2.01, eff. January 1, 2022.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 459 (S.B. 1045), Sec. 1.07, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 22.301. SALARIES OF OFFICERS AND PERSONNEL OF APPELLATE COURTS. The salaries of the state prosecuting attorney and the clerks, other officers, and employees of the supreme court, court of criminal appeals, and courts of appeals shall be determined by the legislature in its appropriation acts for the support of the judiciary.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 22.3015. EXPENSES OF APPELLATE COURT JUDGE OR JUSTICE. (a) A justice of the supreme court, a judge of the court of criminal appeals, or a justice of a court of appeals engaged in the discharge of official duties in a county other than the justice's or judge's county of residence is entitled to traveling and other necessary expenses, as provided by Chapter 660.

(b) A justice of the supreme court, a judge of the court of criminal appeals, or a justice of a court of appeals is entitled to receive from the state the actual and necessary postage, telegraph, and telephone expenses incurred in the discharge of official duties.

(c) The expenses shall be paid by the state on a sworn itemized account showing the expenses.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.001, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 22.302. USE OF TELECONFERENCING TECHNOLOGY. (a) At the discretion of its chief justice or presiding judge, the supreme court, the court of criminal appeals, or a court of appeals may order that oral argument be presented through the use of teleconferencing technology. The court and the parties or their attorneys may participate in oral argument from any location through the use of teleconferencing technology.

(b) In this section, "teleconferencing technology" means technology that provides for a conference of individuals in different locations, connected by electronic means, through both audio and video.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 732, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1085, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 22.303. RECORDING OF CERTAIN COURT PROCEEDINGS. If appropriated funds or donations are available in the amount necessary to cover the cost, the supreme court and the court of criminal appeals shall make a video recording or other electronic visual and audio recording of each oral argument and public meeting of the court and post the recording on the court's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1134 (H.B. 214), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 22.304. COURT SITTING IN PANELS FOR CERTAIN ELECTION PROCEEDINGS; CRIMINAL OFFENSE. (a) In this section, "public official" means any person elected, selected, appointed, employed, or otherwise designated as an officer, employee, or agent of this state, a government agency, a political subdivision, or any other public body established by state law.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law or rule, a court proceeding entitled to priority under Section 22.305 and filed in a court of appeals shall be docketed by the clerk of the court and assigned to a panel of three justices determined using an automated assignment system.

(c) A person, including a public official, commits an offense if the person communicates with a court clerk with the intention of influencing or attempting to influence the composition of a three-justice panel assigned a specific proceeding under this section.

(d) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 8.05, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 22.305. PRIORITY OF CERTAIN ELECTION PROCEEDINGS. (a) The supreme court or a court of appeals shall prioritize over any other proceeding pending or filed in the court a proceeding for injunctive relief or for a writ of mandamus under Chapter 273, Election Code, pending or filed in the court on or after the 70th day before a general or special election.

(b) If granted, oral argument for a proceeding described by Subsection (a) may be given in person or through electronic means.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 8.05, eff. December 2, 2021.